Utah statutes.
63M-1-2906.   Criteria for tax credits.

(1)  A tax credit applicant shall establish as part of the application required by Section 63M-1-2905 that the tax credit applicant:

(a)  meets all of the criteria to receive the tax credit for which the tax credit applicant applies, except for the requirement to obtain a tax credit certificate; and

(b)  will provide a long-term economic benefit to the state.

(2)  The office may not issue a tax credit certificate to a tax credit applicant that fails to meet the requirements of Subsection (1)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 306, 2011 General Session

